North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-12 Public Health, Miscellaneous Provisions
23-12-17.
Workplace breastfeeding policies — Infant friendly designation. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

An employer may use the designation “infant friendly” on its promotional materials if the employer adopts a workplace breastfeeding policy that includes the following:

Flexible work scheduling, including scheduling breaks and permitting work patterns that provide time for expression of breast milk;

A convenient, sanitary, safe, and private location, other than a restroom, allowing privacy for breastfeeding or expressing breast milk;

A convenient clean and safe water source with facilities for washing hands and rinsing breast-pumping equipment located in the private location specified in subdivision b; and

A convenient hygienic refrigerator in the workplace for the temporary storage of the mother’s breast milk.

The state department of health shall establish guidelines for employers concerning workplace breastfeeding and infant friendly designations.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 220, § 2.

23-12-17.
Workplace breastfeeding policies — Infant friendly designation. [Effective September 1, 2022]

An employer may use the designation “infant friendly” on its promotional materials if the employer adopts a workplace breastfeeding policy that includes the following:

Flexible work scheduling, including scheduling breaks and permitting work patterns that provide time for expression of breast milk;

A convenient, sanitary, safe, and private location, other than a restroom, allowing privacy for breastfeeding or expressing breast milk;

A convenient clean and safe water source with facilities for washing hands and rinsing breast-pumping equipment located in the private location specified in subdivision b; and

A convenient hygienic refrigerator in the workplace for the temporary storage of the mother’s breast milk.

The department of health and human services shall establish guidelines for employers concerning workplace breastfeeding and infant friendly designations.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 220, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 210, effective September 1, 2022.

23-12-18.
Medical facility and provider performance reviews and ratings — Notice.

If a medical facility or provider in this state has a performance review that results in the receipt of a rating, and at any time pays a fee to the person completing the rating, the medical facility or provider shall include a public notice in any promotional or marketing activities referring to the rating information stating that the medical facility or provider made a payment and stating the amount of that payment made to the person performing the rating.

Subsection 1 does not apply to a performance review required to maintain licensure or accreditation by governmental or third-party payers or to maintain accreditation by a quality assurance organization.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 221, § 1.

23-12-19.
Voluntary participation in the health information organization — Prohibition on withholding care or benefits.

As used in this section:

“Health information organization” means the health information exchange created under chapter 54-59.

“Individually identifiable health information” has the meaning set forth in title 45, Code of Federal Regulations, section 160.103.

An individual may opt-out of participating in the health information organization by providing notice to the organization. If an individual chooses to opt-out of participating in the health information organization, the individual’s individually identifiable health information may not be accessed by search by a health insurer, government health plan, or health care provider other than the provider who originally created or ordered the creation of the individually identifiable health information.

In opting out of participating in the health information organization under this section, the individual must have the option of:

Opting out of participating; or

Conditionally opting out, in which case the accessibility of the individual’s individually identifiable health information is limited to access by a health care provider who determines access is required by a medical emergency.

An individual’s decision to opt-out of participating in the health information organization:

May be changed at any time by the individual by providing written notice to the health information organization.

Does not prohibit use or disclosure of individually identifiable health information which is required by law.

A health care provider, health insurer, or government health plan may not withhold coverage or care from an individual nor may a health insurer deny an individual a health insurance benefit plan based solely on that individual’s choice to participate or to opt-out of the health information organization.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 214, § 1.

23-12-20.
COVID-19 vaccination and infection information. [Repealed effective August 1, 2023]

Neither a state government entity nor any of its political subdivisions, agents, or assigns may:

Require documentation, whether physical or electronic, for the purpose of certifying or otherwise communicating the following before providing access to property, funds, or services:

An individual’s COVID-19 vaccination status;

The presence of COVID-19 pathogens, antigens, or antibodies; or

An individual’s COVID-19 post-transmission recovery status;

Otherwise publish or share an individual’s COVID-19 vaccination record or similar health information, except as specifically authorized by the individual or otherwise authorized by statute; or

Require a private business to obtain documentation, whether physical or electronic, for purposes of certifying or otherwise communicating the following before employment or providing access to property, funds, or services based on:

An individual’s COVID-19 vaccination status;

The presence of COVID-19 pathogens, antigens, or antibodies; or

An individual’s COVID-19 post-transmission recovery status.

Subsection 1 does not apply to the department of corrections and rehabilitation, a correctional facility as defined under section 12-44.1-01, the state hospital, or a public health unit.

A private business located in this state or doing business in this state may not require a patron, client, or customer in this state to provide any documentation certifying COVID-19 vaccination, the presence of COVID-19 pathogens, antigens, or antibodies, or COVID-19 post-transmission recovery to gain access to, entry upon, or services from the business.This subsection does not apply to a developmental disability residential facility or a health care provider, including a long-term care provider, basic care provider, and assisted living provider. As used in this subsection, a private business does not include a nonprofit entity that does not sell a product or a service.

This section may not be construed to interfere with an individual’s rights to access that individual’s own personal health information or with a person’s right to access personal health information of others which the person otherwise has a right to access.

Subsection 1 is not applicable to the state board of higher education, the university system, or institutions under the control of the state board of higher education to the extent the entity has adopted policies and procedures governing the type of documentation required, the circumstances under which such documentation may be shared, and exemptions from providing such documentation.

This section is not applicable during a public health disaster or emergency declared in accordance with chapter 37-17.1.

As used in this section, the term “COVID-19” means severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 identified as SARS-CoV-2 and any mutation or viral fragments of SARS-CoV-2.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 204, § 1, effective May 10, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 558, § 2, effective November 15, 2021; repealed by 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 558, § 4, effective August 1, 2023.